Florida, session 2026, SB486.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 24 25 Section 1.âPresent subsection (29) of section 1001.42, 26 Florida Statutes, is redesignated as subsection (30), and a new 27 subsection (29) is added to that section, to read: 28 1001.42âPowers and duties of district school board.âThe 29 district school board, acting as a board, shall exercise all 30 powers and perform all duties listed below: 31 (29)âTITLE VI COORDINATOR.â 32 (a)âEach district school board shall designate a Title VI 33 coordinator. The coordinator shall: 34 1.âHave expertise in and oversee compliance with Title VI 35 of the Civil Rights Act of 1964 and compliance with s. 1000.05. 36 2.âPromote equal access to and participation in the 37 programs and activities of the institution. 38 3.âProvide training and educational resources regarding 39 Title VI law and regulations, including, at a minimum, those who 40 are responsible for receiving reports on potential Title VI 41 complaints. 42 4.âMaintain records and reports related to Title VI 43 compliance, including a summary of the allegations, the 44 complainantâs protected category, the disposition of the 45 complaint, and the corrective actions taken, so that the Title 46 VI coordinator can assess compliance. 47 5.âProvide advice and consultation on supportive and 48 corrective measures. 49 6.âPerform any other relevant duty established by the 50 institution. 51 (b)1.âA person alleging discrimination in violation of 52 Title VI may file a complaint with the district school 53 superintendent or the Title VI coordinator of the school 54 district. 55 2.âA parent or guardian may submit a complaint on behalf of 56 his or her minor child. 57 (c)âThe State Board of Education shall adopt rules to 58 implement this subsection. 59 Section 2.âSection 1004.041, Florida Statutes, is created 60 to read: 61 1004.041âTitle VI coordinator.â 62 (1)âEach Florida College System institution and state 63 university shall designate a Title VI coordinator. The 64 coordinator shall: 65 (a)âHave expertise in and oversee compliance with Title VI 66 of the Civil Rights Act of 1964 and compliance with s. 1000.05. 67 (b)âPromote equal access to and participation in the 68 programs and activities of the institution. 69 (c)âProvide training and educational resources regarding 70 Title VI law and regulations, including, at a minimum, those who 71 are responsible for receiving reports on potential Title VI 72 complaints. 73 (d)âMaintain records and reports related to Title VI 74 compliance, including a summary of the allegations, the 75 complainantâs protected category, the disposition of the 76 complaint, and the corrective actions taken, so that the Title 77 VI coordinator can assess compliance. 78 (e)âProvide advice and consultation on supportive and 79 corrective measures. 80 (f)âPerform any other relevant duty established by the 81 institution. 82 (2)(a)âA person alleging discrimination in violation of 83 Title VI may file a complaint with the collegeâs or universityâs 84 dean of students or Title VI coordinator. 85 (b)âA parent or guardian may submit a complaint on behalf 86 of his or her minor child. 87 (3)âThe State Board of Education and Board of Governors 88 shall adopt rules and regulations, respectively, to implement 89 this section. 90 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.